Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-305] Denial, suspension, and
revocation of securities registration. (a) The commissioner may issue a
stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the
effectiveness of, a registration statement if the commissioner finds that the
order is in the public interest and that:

(1) The registration statement as of its effective
date or before the effective date in the case of an order denying
effectiveness, an amendment under section 485A-304(j) as of its effective date,
or a report under section 485A-304(i), is incomplete in a material respect or
contains a statement that, in the light of the circumstances under which it was
made, was false or misleading with respect to a material fact;

(2) This chapter, or a rule adopted or order issued
under this chapter, or a condition imposed under this chapter has been wilfully
violated in connection with the offering by the person filing the registration
statement; by the issuer, a partner, officer, or director of the issuer or a
person having a similar status or performing a similar function; by a promoter
of the issuer; or by a person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled
by the issuer, but only if the person filing the registration statement
is directly or indirectly controlled by or acting for the issuer, by an
underwriter;

(3) The security registered or sought to be
registered is the subject of a permanent or temporary injunction of a court of
competent jurisdiction or an administrative stop order or similar order issued
under any federal, foreign, or state law other than this chapter applicable to
the offering; provided that the commissioner may not institute a proceeding
against an effective registration statement under this paragraph:

(A) More than one year after the date of the
order or injunction on which it is based; or

(B) On the basis of an order or injunction
issued under the securities act of another state unless the order or injunction
was based on conduct that would constitute, as of the date of the order, a
ground for a stop order under this section;

(4) The issuer's enterprise or method of business
includes or would include activities that are unlawful where performed;

(5) The applicant or registrant has not paid the
filing fee; provided that the commissioner shall void the order if the
deficiency is corrected; or

(6) The offering:

(A) Will work or tend to work a fraud upon
purchasers;

(B) Has been or would be made with
unreasonable amounts of underwriters' and sellers' discounts, commissions, or
other compensation, or promoters' profits or participations, or unreasonable
amounts or kinds of options; or

(C) Is being made on terms that are unfair,
unjust, or inequitable.

(b) The commissioner may not institute a stop
order proceeding against an effective registration statement on the basis of
conduct or a transaction known to the commissioner when the registration
statement became effective unless the proceeding is instituted within thirty
days after the registration statement became effective.

(c) The commissioner may summarily revoke,
deny, postpone, or suspend the effectiveness of a registration statement
pending final determination of an administrative proceeding. Upon the issuance
of the order, the commissioner shall promptly notify each person specified in
subsection (d) that the order has been issued, the reasons for the revocation,
denial, postponement, or suspension, and that within fifteen days after the
receipt of a request in a record from the person, the matter will be scheduled
for a hearing. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the
commissioner within thirty days after the date of service of the order, the
order becomes final. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the commissioner,
after notice of and opportunity for hearing for each person subject to the
order, may modify or vacate the order or extend the order until final
determination. During the pendency of any hearing requested under this
subsection, the order shall remain in effect unless vacated or modified by the
commissioner; provided that any penalty shall not take effect until the final
order is issued.

(d) A stop order shall not be issued
under this section without:

(1) Appropriate notice to the applicant or
registrant, the issuer, and the person on whose behalf the securities are to be
or have been offered;

(2) An opportunity for hearing; and

(3) Findings of fact and conclusions of law in a
record in accordance with chapter 91.

(e) The commissioner may modify or vacate a
stop order issued under this section if the commissioner finds that the
conditions that caused its issuance have changed or that it is necessary or
appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors. The
modification or vacation shall not be subject to a hearing or chapter 91. [L
2006, c 229, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next